California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(a) The director may only approve a project agreement that appears to effectively contribute to the creation, expansion, or maintenance of markets abroad. Primary emphasis shall be on commercial markets. The director shall give preference to project agreements that demonstrate potential for establishing long-term benefits. Special consideration may also be given for any of the following:

(1) Cooperators who are new to the market.

(2) New product promotion.

(3) Cooperators who are unable to obtain federal cooperator status.

(4) Cooperators whose project proposals involve foreign markets not currently authorized pursuant to regulations adopted by the Foreign Agricultural Service. 

(b) Approvals and priorities shall be based on the following criteria:

(1) Potential for creating, maintaining, or increasing consumption and exports of California agricultural commodities to other countries.

(2) Long-range contribution to California agricultural exports.

(3) Ability of the cooperator to provide a competent staff and other resources to ensure adequate development, supervision, and execution of project activities.

(4) Willingness and ability of private organizations to back up promotional activities with aggressive selling and adequate supplies of commodities of the quality desired by foreign buyers.

(5) Competition in the market.

(6) Cultural, political, and economic obstacles which restrict imports of California agricultural commodities into the markets.

(7) An assessment of the project costs compared to the benefits of expanding California agricultural exports.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1189, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

58573.

Project agreements may promote either a single commodity or a group of related commodities. Activities shall be aimed at increasing both consumer and commercial uses for agricultural commodities. Activities carried out by cooperators fall under the following three categories:

(a) Technical assistance, which includes activities to address technical problems related to trade impediments and to the sale, movement, processing, marketing, or utilization of agricultural commodities.

(b) Market development activities, which include activities involving foreign traders, importers, wholesalers, retailers, and foreign government officials who import, distribute, and market agricultural commodities.

(c) Consumer promotion activities, which include activities to influence consumers by changing attitudes toward, or making them aware of the advantages of utilizing, California agricultural products.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1189, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

58574.

(a) State funds may be used to pay costs which are essential to, and clearly identifiable with, the carrying out of the activities specified in the marketing plan approved by the director.

(b) The director shall adopt regulations similar to those developed by the Foreign Agriculture Service of the United States Department of Agriculture to proscribe the unauthorized use of state funds pursuant to this chapter.

(c) Not more than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) shall be annually appropriated for this program’s state administrative costs, as specified in the annual Budget Act. The funds appropriated for administrative costs pursuant to this subdivision shall be derived from the redistribution of the total amount of funds that are appropriated in the annual Budget Act by the Legislature to carry out this chapter.

(d) Not more than 15 percent of the funds annually appropriated for this program shall be used for any one project agreement in any one year unless the director approves a higher level upon concurrence of a majority vote of the advisory committee authorized pursuant to Section 58576.

(e) Cooperators shall provide an annual contribution which is equal to or greater than the amount of state funds utilized for each project agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 100, Sec. 3.   Effective May 18, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

58575.

Activities undertaken pursuant to this chapter shall be supplemental to, and not a substitute for, any market development activities undertaken by the federal government.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1189, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

58577.

(a) (1) The director, the Director of General Services, and the advisory committee shall take necessary precautions to assure the confidentiality of the information that is contained in proposals for project agreements, market development plans, progress reports, documents in support of claims for funding under a project agreement, and other pertinent information submitted by individual marketing organizations.

(2) This information is exempt from the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(b) Notwithstanding Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the advisory committee may hold a closed meeting if an applicant requests that the submitted information not be discussed in an open meeting and the committee determines that it is in the best interest of the program to conduct a closed meeting for that purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 130.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

58578.

All project agreements entered into pursuant to this chapter, unless exempted in accordance with Section 10351 of the Public Contract Code, shall be submitted to the Director of General Services for approval. The director shall have 15 working days from the date of submittal to review and approve or disapprove.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 218, Sec. 5.   Effective June 30, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

58580.

Nothing in this chapter precludes the director from separately funding project proposals coming from private or nonprofit agricultural marketing organizations, state marketing order boards, or commissions which are actively engaged in the marketing of the same commodities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 218, Sec. 7.   Effective June 30, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Funding [58582. - 58583.]

58582.

(a) The California Agricultural Export Promotion Account is hereby created in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the money in the account is continuously appropriated to the secretary to support export promotional and public relations activities conducted generally and pursuant to this chapter.

(b) The account shall consist exclusively of funds received for the purpose of subdivision (a) from private industry sources, marketing order advisory boards established pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 58601) of Part 2, and agricultural councils and agricultural commissions established pursuant to Division 22 (commencing with Section 64001).

(c) Funds expended from the account shall be used exclusively for activities that directly benefit the industry sources from which the funds are derived.

(d) Consistent with subdivision (c), funds expended from the account may be used for representational allowance expenditures for the purpose of providing proper representation of California to foreign government officials and federal officials of the United States, which shall include both of the following:

(1) Business-related meals that include the participation of foreign government officials or federal officials of the United States and the California agricultural industry, not to exceed 300 percent of established per diem rates.

(2) Representational gifts, not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per
 item.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 577, Sec. 1.   (AB 2832)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

58583.

The secretary may enter into goods and services contracts using funds from the California Agricultural Export Promotion Account for the activities described in subdivision (c) of Section 58582 and using federal funds authorized for international activities, as necessary. Notwithstanding any other law, those goods and services contracts shall be exempt from any contracting requirements applicable only to state contracts, including, but not limited to, Section 10295 of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 577, Sec. 2.   (AB 2832)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Institutional Purchasers of Agricultural Products [58595. - 58595.]

58595.

(a) A California state-owned or state-run institution that purchases agricultural food products shall implement necessary practices to achieve a goal of ensuring that at least 60 percent of the agricultural food products that it purchases in a calendar year are grown or produced in the state by December 31, 2025.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to segments of public postsecondary education or local educational agencies.

(c) A local educational agency that solicits bids for the purchase of an agricultural food product shall accept a bid or price for that agricultural food product when it is grown in California before accepting a
 bid or price for a domestic agricultural food product that is grown outside the state, when both of the following are met:

(1) The bid or price of the California-grown agricultural food product does not exceed the lowest bid or price for a domestic agricultural food product produced outside the state.

(2) The quality of the California-grown agricultural food product is comparable to that domestic agricultural food product produced outside the state.

(d) This section shall
 neither limit nor expand California’s obligations under the Agreement on Government Procurement of the World Trade Organization.

(e) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Agricultural food product” means any fresh or processed
 food product including, but not limited to, fruits, nuts, vegetables, herbs, mushrooms, dairy, shell eggs, honey, pollen, grains, livestock meats, poultry meats, rabbit meats, and fish, including shellfish.

(2) “Local educational agency” has the same meaning as defined in Section 49557.5 of the Education Code.

(3) “Segment of public postsecondary education” means a segment of public higher education described in Section 66010 of the Education Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 576, Sec. 2.   (AB 778)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. The Buy American Food Act [58596.1. - 58596.5.]

58596.1.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Buy American Food Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 602, Sec. 2.   (SB 490)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 58596.5.)
-------------------------------------------

58596.2.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Agricultural food product” means a fresh or processed product, including fruits, nuts, vegetables, herbs, mushrooms, dairy, shell eggs, honey, grains, livestock meats, poultry meats, and fish, including shellfish.

(b) “Domestic” means inside of the United States.

(c) “Local educational agency” has the same meaning as defined in Section 49557.5 of the Education Code.

(d) “Nondomestic” means outside of the United States.

(e) “Public
 institution” means any state, city, or county agency, including a public postsecondary educational institution and a local educational agency as defined by this section.

(f) “Public postsecondary educational institution” means the California Community Colleges and the California State University, but not the University of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 602, Sec. 2.   (SB 490)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 58596.5.)
-------------------------------------------

58596.3.

(a) A public institution that receives federal meal reimbursement funding to provide prepared meals and that solicits bids for the purchase of an agricultural food product shall include in their solicitation for bids and contracts that only the purchase of agricultural food products grown, packed, or processed domestically is authorized, unless any of the following applies:

(1) The bid or price of the nondomestic agricultural food product is more than 25 percent lower than the bid or price of the domestic agricultural food product.

(2) The quality of the domestic agricultural food product is inferior to the quality of the agricultural food product grown, packed, or produced
 nondomestically.

(3) The agricultural food product is not produced or manufactured domestically in sufficient and reasonably available quantities of a satisfactory quality to meet the needs of the public institution.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to any of the following: 

(1) The Child and Adult Care Food Program.

(2) The Summer Food Service Program.

(3) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(c) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to agricultural food products purchased by or provided to a public institution through the United States Department of Agriculture.

(d) (1) A public institution subject to this section shall retain documentation relating to bids or contracts for, and for the purchase of, agricultural food products for three years from the date of purchase.

(2) The documentation required to be retained pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be made available to the public upon request during the applicable three-year period. The requirement of this paragraph may be satisfied by providing documentation that may include, but is not limited to, vendor invoices or contract specifications requiring that vendors meet the requirements of this section.

(e) If a vendor substitutes an agricultural food product without notice or because a product is not available, the public institution shall not be in violation of this section.

(f) This section
 shall neither limit nor expand California’s obligations under the Agreement on Government Procurement of the World Trade Organization.

(g) Local educational agencies with an annual federal meal reimbursement of less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) are exempt from this section.

(h) (1) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2024.

(2) If an existing contract is in place between a public institution and a food supplier on January 1, 2024, this section shall apply to that public institution upon the next successive contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 602, Sec. 2.   (SB 490)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, by its own provisions.    Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 58596.5.)
-------------------------------------------

58596.4.

(a) To monitor price gouging, any local educational agency participating in a federal school lunch or school meal program subject to subdivision (a) of Section 58596.3 may report to the State Department of Education any increases in the prices of agricultural food products that exceeds 25 percent of the previous year’s prices and is encouraged to retain documentation to support the complaint. Documentation may include, but is not limited to, an invoice, receipt, or bill of sale.

(b) The State Department of Education shall annually post on its internet website the aggregate information on reports received from local educational agencies pursuant to subdivision (a) on price increases.

(c) The State Department of Education shall add a question to the administrative review required pursuant to Section 210.18 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations (7 C.F.R. 210.18) regarding any increases of the price of agricultural food products and the annual costs associated with implementing Section 58596.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 602, Sec. 2.   (SB 490)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 58596.5.)
-------------------------------------------

58596.5.

This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 602, Sec. 2.   (SB 490)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 8, commencing with Section 58596.1.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. GENERAL MARKETING LAWS [58601. - 60016.]



  CHAPTER 1. California Marketing Act of 1937 [58601. - 59293.]



  ARTICLE 1. Short Title and Definitions [58601. - 58624.]

58601.

This chapter shall be known as “The California Marketing Act of 1937.”

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58602.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58603.

“Administrative rules and regulations” means rules and regulations that are applicable to a particular marketing order or agreement which are issued and made effective by the director pursuant to Article 18 (commencing with Section 59161) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58604.

“Advertising and sales promotion” means, in addition to its ordinarily accepted meaning, trade promotion and activities for the prevention, modification, or removal of trade barriers which restrict the free flow of any commodity to market and may include the presentation of facts to, and negotiations with, state, federal, or foreign governmental agencies on matters which affect the marketing of any commodity that is included in any marketing order or marketing agreement which is made effective pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58604.5.

“Advertising and sales promotion” also means, in addition to its ordinary accepted meaning, activities for the modification or removal of trade barriers that restrict the free flow of a commodity to market, including negotiation with federal and foreign governments, and the allowance of reimbursement payments to offset commodity transportation or other costs to selected domestic and foreign markets.

Domestic f.o.b. selling price shall not be used as a factor in determining qualifications for reimbursement payments unless the director determines that there is no feasible alternative for establishing these qualifications.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 312, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

58605.

“Commodity,” except as otherwise provided in Section 58747, means any agricultural, aquacultural, horticultural (including floricultural), vermicultural, viticultural (including wine) or vegetable product which is produced in this state, any fish or seafood, or any class, variety, or utilization of that product, either in its natural state or as processed by a processor or as processed by a producer for the purpose of marketing that product. It includes bees, honey, and milk as defined in Section 32511. It does not, however, include timber or any timber product.

The Legislature hereby declares that the addition of the phrase “(including wine)” in this section is made for the purpose of clarification only and shall not be construed or interpreted as an indication that wine is not a commodity as originally defined by Chapter 404, Statutes of 1937, and as heretofore amended. The Legislature further declares that at the time of the original enactment of the definition of the term “commodity” and at all times since, it intended that wine be, and wine was, included within the definition of the term. Every marketing order issued, signed, or declared effective prior to July 15, 1941, and every act of the director prior to such date which was performed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and consistent with the declarations which are contained in this paragraph are hereby confirmed, ratified, and validated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 810, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

58606.

“Directly affecting” or “directly affected” is synonymous with “directly regulating” and “directly regulated,” and means the direct application of regulations upon any person, including the requirement to pay assessments which are levied pursuant to any marketing order or marketing agreement which is issued by the director pursuant to this chapter. A requirement upon handlers to deduct and remit to the director assessments that are owed by producers under a marketing order or marketing agreement which is applicable upon producers only, does not, however, directly regulate such handlers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58607.

“Distributing” means engaging in the business of a distributor as defined in Section 58608.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58608.

“Distributor” means any person that engages in the operation of selling, marketing, or distributing, in intrastate commerce any commodity which he has produced or purchased or acquired from a producer or which he is marketing on behalf of a producer, whether as owner, agent, employee, broker, or otherwise. It does not, however, include a retailer, except a retailer that purchases or acquires from, or handles on behalf of any producer, any commodity which was not previously subjected to regulation by the marketing order which covers such commodity.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58608.1.

“Educational program,” unless otherwise defined in this chapter, means a program established by the director pursuant to this chapter that provides for the planning and implementation of activities designed to inform the general public of the processes of producing agricultural commodities and designed to foster cooperation and understanding between urban and rural sectors of society.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 385, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

58609.

“Fish” means every form of fish, either salt water or fresh water fish, which is used for human consumption, except fish for canning, retorting, reduction, or use in an extraction process.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58610.

“General rules and regulations” means rules and regulations, which are applicable to all marketing orders and marketing agreements and are issued and made effective by the director without prior notice and public hearing, to provide uniform methods and procedures to facilitate the administration and enforcement of all such marketing orders and marketing agreements. Such uniform methods and procedures may include but shall not be limited to any of the following:

(a) Methods and procedures which pertain to the receiving, depositing, and expenditure of moneys which are received from assessments collected pursuant to this chapter.

(b) The preparation, handling, and payment of claim schedules for the payment of bills, salaries, and other obligations.

(c) Establishing the maximum rates to be allowed for travel expenses of board members and board employees.

(d) The preparation, verification, and filing of evidence which relates to violations of marketing orders, agreements, and marketing regulations which are authorized pursuant to this chapter and other fiscal and administrative activities which the director finds are necessary to obtain reasonable uniformity, efficiency, and economy in the administration and enforcement of such marketing orders and agreements of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58611.

“Handler,” except with respect to fish and seafood, means any person that is engaged within this state as a distributor in the business of distributing any commodity in intrastate commerce, or any person that is engaged as a processor in the business of processing any commodity. With respect to fish and seafood, it means any person that is engaged in the business of the distribution or sale of fish or seafood to restaurants, or to retailers for resale to consumers, or to any other persons or concerns for resale or for sale direct to consumers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58612.

“Handling” means engaging in the business of a handler as defined in Section 58611.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58613.

“Major amendments” mean amendments to any marketing order or agreement which are made pursuant to Article 13 (commencing with Section 59021) of this chapter. It does not include a seasonal marketing regulation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58614.

“Marketed by producers” means producer marketing, as defined by Section 58621.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58615.

“Marketing order” means an order which is issued by the director, pursuant to this chapter, which prescribes rules and regulations that govern the processing, distributing, or handling in any manner of any commodity within this state during any specified period.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58616.

“Minor amendments” are amendments to any marketing order or agreement which are made effective by the director upon recommendation of the advisory board which is concerned, as specified in Article 14 (commencing with Section 59051) of this chapter, with or without prior notice and public hearing, which change or modify the language or the provisions of any such marketing order or agreement for the purpose of clarification, or the removal of conflicts of meaning without involving changes or modifications of language, or provisions which are classed as major amendments.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58617.

“Person” means an individual, firm, corporation, association, or any other business unit, and, for the purposes of this chapter, includes any state agency which engages in any of the commercial activities which are regulated pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58618.

“Processing” means engaging in the business of a processor as defined in Section 58619.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58619.

“Processor” means any person that is engaged within this state in the operation of receiving, grading, packing, canning, fermenting, distilling, extracting, preserving, grinding, crushing, or changing the form of any commodity for the purpose of preparing it for market or of marketing such commodity, or any other activities which are performed for the purpose of preparing it for market or of marketing such commodity. It does not, however, include a person that is engaged in manufacturing from any commodity, so changed in form, another and different product.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58620.

“Producer” means any person that is engaged within this state in the business of producing, or causing to be produced for market, any commodity.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58621.

“Producer marketing” means any or all operations which are performed by any producer in preparing for market. It includes selling, delivering, or disposing of for commercial purposes, to any handler any commodity which the producer has produced.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58622.

“Retailer” means any person that purchases or acquires any commodity for resale at retail to the general public for consumption off the premises. Such person is also included within the definition of distributor, to the extent that such person engages in the business of a distributor as defined in Section 58607.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58623.

“Seafood” means shellfish and every other form of animal or plant life which is taken from fresh or salt water and used for human consumption, except seafood which is used for canning, retorting, reduction, or used in an extraction process.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58624.

“Seasonal marketing regulations” mean marketing regulations that are applicable to a particular marketing order or agreement which are made effective by the director pursuant to Article 19 (commencing with Section 59171) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [58651. - 58661.]

58651.

It is hereby declared that the marketing of commodities in this state in excess of reasonable and normal market demands therefor; disorderly marketing of such commodities; improper preparation for market and lack of uniform grading and classification of commodities; unfair methods of competition in the marketing of commodities; and the inability of individual producers to maintain present markets or to develop new or larger markets for California-grown commodities, results in an unreasonable and unnecessary economic waste of the agricultural wealth of this state.

Such conditions and the accompanying waste jeopardize the future continued production of adequate supplies of food, fiber, and other products of the farm and of the soil for the people of this and other states, and prevent producers from obtaining a fair return from their labor, their farms, and the commodities which they produce.

As a consequence, the purchasing power of such producers has been in the past, and may continue to be in the future, unless such conditions are remedied, low in relation to that of persons engaged in other gainful occupations within the state. Producers are thereby prevented from maintaining a proper standard of living and from contributing their fair share to the support of the necessary governmental and educational functions, thus tending to increase unfairly the tax burdens of other citizens of this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58652.

These conditions vitally concern the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state. It is hereby declared to be the policy of this state to aid producers in preventing economic waste in the marketing of their commodities, to develop more efficient and equitable methods in the marketing of commodities and to aid producers in restoring and maintaining their purchasing power at a more adequate, equitable and reasonable level.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58653.

The marketing of commodities within this state is hereby declared to be affected with a public interest. The provisions of this chapter are enacted in the exercise of the police powers of this state for the purpose of protecting the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58654.

The purposes of this chapter are to do the following:

(a) Enable producers of this state, with the aid of the state, to correlate more effectively the marketing of their commodities with market demands for those commodities. 

(b) Establish orderly marketing of commodities. 

(c) Provide for uniform grading and proper preparation of commodities for market. 

(d) Provide methods and means for the maintenance of present markets, or for the development of new or larger markets, for commodities that are grown within this state or for the prevention, modification, or elimination of trade barriers that obstruct the free flow of those commodities to market. 

(e) Eliminate or reduce economic waste in the marketing of commodities. 

(f) Restore and maintain adequate purchasing power for the producers of this state.

(g) Inform the general public of the processes of producing agricultural commodities. 

(h) Foster cooperation and understanding between urban and rural sectors of society.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 385, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

58655.

In any civil or criminal action or proceeding for violation of any of the following, proof that the act which is complained of was done in compliance with the provisions of this chapter or a marketing order which is issued pursuant to, and in furtherance of the purposes and provisions of this chapter, is a complete defense to such action or proceeding:

(a) The Cartwright Act, Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16700), Part 2, Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code.

(b) The Unfair Practices Act, Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17000), Part 2, Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code.

(c) The Fair Trade Act, Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 16900), Part 2, Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code.

(d) Any rule of statutory or common law against monopolies or combinations in restraint of trade.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58657.

The provisions of this chapter regarding the marketing of commodities are applicable to fish and seafood and persons that handle, process, or distribute fish and seafood.

Any marketing order or agreement relating to fish and seafood shall affect handlers only. It may include only those provisions which are authorized by Sections 58889 and 58892, and any other provisions of this chapter necessary to carry out the purposes of Sections 58889 and 58892. Such provisions shall apply to all fish and seafood whether or not they are a product of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 702.)
-------------------------------------------

58658.

If any section, sentence, clause, or part of this chapter is for any reason held to be unconstitutional, such decision shall not affect the remaining portions of this chapter. The Legislature hereby declares that it would have passed this chapter and each section, sentence, clause, and part of this chapter despite the fact that one or more sections, sentences, clauses, or parts of this chapter is declared unconstitutional.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58659.

The suspension, amendment, or termination of any marketing order or marketing agreement does not suspend or terminate any cause of action which has accrued under it, but such cause of action shall survive and exist the same as if such marketing order or agreement had not been suspended, amended, or terminated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58660.

It is hereby declared, as a matter of legislative determination, that the amendments of the statutory predecessor of Sections 58651 to 58653, inclusive, (former Section 1300.10) which were made at the 1959 General Session are enacted in the exercise of the power of this state for the purpose of protecting and furthering the public health and welfare.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58661.

The term volume, or quantity, as used in this chapter, except Article 9 (commencing with Section 58881), may be in terms of gross dollar value if the director finds that such volume or quantity cannot be readily ascertained otherwise, or that gross dollar value is a more equitable measure of the commodity involved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1176.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Exceptions [58681. - 58682.]

58681.

This chapter does not apply to any order, rule, or regulation which is issued, or is issuable, by the Public Utilities Commission or the Interstate Commerce Commission with respect to the operation of common carriers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58682.

This chapter is not applicable to any retailer of any commodity except to the extent that such retailer also engages in the production, processing or distribution of any commodity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 702.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Administration [58711. - 58714.]

58711.

The director shall administer and enforce this chapter and may exercise any or all of the administrative powers which are conferred by Sections 11180 to 11191, inclusive, of the Government Code upon the head of a department of the state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58712.

In order to effectuate the declared purposes of this chapter, the director may issue, administer, and enforce the provisions of any marketing order issued pursuant to this chapter which regulates producer marketing or the handling of any commodity within this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58713.

The director may do all of the following:

(a) Confer and cooperate with the legally constituted authorities of other states and of the United States, for the purpose of obtaining uniformity in the administration of federal and state marketing regulations, licenses, or orders.

(b) Conduct joint hearings and issue joint or concurrent marketing orders for the purposes and within the standards which are set forth in this chapter.

(c) Exercise any administrative authority which is prescribed by this chapter to effect such uniformity of administration and regulation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58714.

The director may purchase general liability insurance for all marketing orders subject to the provisions of this chapter in an amount he or she determines as necessary. The cost of the insurance shall be paid by the affected marketing orders on a pro rata basis. The insurance policy shall name the director, in his or her official capacity, and all persons, collectively, that are subject to the marketing order as insured parties for claims made against the marketing order in its advisory capacity to the director or against the director regarding the activities of a marketing order. The director, after consultation with the Attorney General, may refer claims to the insurance carrier for appropriate action. In the alternative, the director may require that claims be handled in the manner otherwise specified in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 383, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Marketing Orders and Agreements [58741. - 58750.]

58741.

Subject to the provisions, restrictions, and limitations which are imposed in this chapter, the director may issue marketing orders which regulate producer marketing, the processing, distributing, or handling in any manner of any commodity by any and all persons that are engaged in such producer marketing, processing, distributing, or handling of such commodity within this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)